Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6600YH (3) 91 sc/js H.F. 2549 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 8A.331 Mechanical insulation energy 1 audit. 2 1. The department shall contract with a certified 3 technician to perform a mechanical insulation energy audit for 4 each state-owned building by January 1, 2028, and every four 5 years thereafter. The audit shall do all of the following: 6 a. Identify all missing and damaged mechanical insulation in 7 the building. 8 b. Assess whether the mechanical insulation is in 9 compliance with American society of heating, refrigerating and 10 air-conditioning engineers standard 90.1. 11 c. Provide an estimate of emissions released and energy lost 12 due to damaged and missing mechanical insulation. 13 d. Provide an estimate for the cost of remediation of 14 damaged and missing mechanical insulation and the length of 15 time to achieve a return on the investment. 16 2. For purposes of this section, âmechanical insulationâ 17 means materials, facings, and accessory products of mechanical 18 systems, including piping and ventilation. 19